Illinois, session 104th, HB5507.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Food 5Reform to Ensure Student Health Act. 6    Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to 7facilitate and support the creation of health promoting eating 8environments in this State.  9    Section 2.5. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Category of food" means the following groups of food:11        (1) fruits;12        (2) vegetables;13        (3) grains;14        (4) cereals;15        (5) beans, peas, and lentils;16        (6) nuts, seeds, and soy products;17        (7) beverages;18        (8) dairy;19        (9) seafood;20        (10) poultry;21        (11) meat;22        (12) eggs;  HB5507- 2 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1        (13) condiments;2        (14) fats and oils; and3        (15) herbs and spices.4    The Department, by rule, may expand, clarify, or subdivide 5the groups of food enumerated in this definition.6    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.7    "Food" means all food and beverages intended for sale or 8to be served to school pupils on campus during the school day.9    "Food product" means a finished product of food or 10beverage with a unique universal product code, other than food 11products reimbursed under programs authorized by the federal 12Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (Public Law 13113-79) and the federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966 (42 U.S.C. 141771 et seq.), and foods provided by the United States 15Department of Agriculture Foods in Schools program.16    "Health promoting eating environments" means, in places 17where foods and beverages are served or sold, there are 18healthy, good quality, culturally appropriate, and affordable 19options.20    "Local educational agency" means a school district, 21regional office of education, or charter school.22    "Public entity" means the State, a State agency, a unit of 23local government, or a school district.24    "School" means an elementary or secondary school or any 25public entity that purchases a food product to provide to 26pupils on campus during the school day in an elementary or   HB5507- 3 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1secondary school.2    "School day" means that period of time during which the 3pupil is required to be in attendance for instructional 4purposes. 5    Section 3. Ultraprocessed food 6    (a)(1) As used in this Act, except as provided in 7subsection (b), "ultraprocessed food" or "UPF" means any food 8or beverage that contains a substance described in paragraph 9(2) and either high amounts of saturated fat, sodium, or added 10sugar, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), or a 11nonnutritive sweetener or other substance described in 12subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3).13    (2)(A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), substances 14available in the United States Food and Drug Administration 15Substances Added to Food database that are designated as 16having any of the following FDA-defined technical effects:17        (i) Surface-active agents, as defined in 21 CFR 18    170.3(o)(29).19        (ii) Stabilizers and thickeners, as defined in 21 CFR 20    170.3(o)(28).21        (iii) Propellants, aerating agents, and gases, as 22    defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(25).23        (iv) Colors and coloring adjuncts, as defined in 21 24    CFR 170.3(o)(4).25        (v) Emulsifiers and emulsifier salts, as defined in 21   HB5507- 4 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    CFR 170.3(o)(8).2        (vi) Flavoring agents and adjuvants, as defined in 21 3    CFR 170.3(o)(12), excluding spices and other natural 4    seasonings and flavorings as listed in 21 CFR 182.10.5        (vii) Flavor enhancers, as defined in 21 CFR 6    170.3(o)(11), excluding spices and other natural 7    seasonings and flavorings as listed in 21 CFR 182.10.8        (viii) Nonnutritive sweeteners, as defined in 21 CFR 9    170.3(o)(19).10    (B) Any of the following additives, or combination of 11these additives, shall not by themselves cause a food or 12beverage to be categorized as a UPF:13        (i) Salt or sodium chloride.14        (ii) Spices or other natural seasonings or flavorings, 15    as listed in 21 CFR 182.10.16        (iii) Natural color additives, as listed in 21 CFR 17    Part 73.18    (3)(A) High amounts of saturated fat, sodium, or added 19sugar, as defined respectively as follows:20        (i) The food or beverage contains 10% or greater of 21    total energy from saturated fat.22        (ii) The food or beverage contains a ratio of 23    milligrams of sodium to calories that is equal to or 24    greater than 1:1.25        (iii) The food or beverage contains 10% or greater of 26    total energy from added sugars.  HB5507- 5 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    (B) Nonnutritive sweeteners, as defined in 21 CFR 2170.3(o)(19), or any of the following substances:3        (i) D-sorbitol (CAS 50-70-4).4        (ii) Erythritol (CAS 149-32-6).5        (iii) Hydrogenated starch hydrolysates, including, but 6    not limited to, CAS 68425-17-2.7        (iv) Sucralose (CAS 56038-13-2).8        (v) Isomalt, including, but not limited to, CAS 9    64519-82-0, CAS 534-73-6, and CAS 20942-99-8.10        (vi) Lactitol (CAS 585-86-4).11        (vii) Luo Han Fruit Concentrate (CAS 977188-77-4).12        (viii) Maltitol (CAS 585-88-6).13        (ix) Steviol glycosides, including, but not limited 14    to, CAS 58543-16-1, CAS 57817-89-7, CAS 1220616-44-3, CAS 15    58543-16-1, and CAS 1220616-34-1.16        (x) Thaumatin, including, but not limited to, CAS 17    977178-03-2 and CAS 53850-34-3.18        (xi) Xylitol (CAS 87-99-0).19    (b) "Ultraprocessed food" or "UPF" does not include any of 20the following:21        (1) Commodity food specifically made available by the 22    United States Department of Agriculture.23        (2) A raw agricultural commodity.24        (3) An unprocessed locally grown or locally raised 25    agricultural product as defined in paragraph (2) of 26    subsection (g) of 7 CFR 210.21.  HB5507- 6 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1        (4) Minimally processed prepared food as defined by 2    the Department by rule, which may include foods in a 3    variety of forms, including, but not limited to, whole, 4    cut, sliced, diced, canned, pureed, dried, and 5    pasteurized.6        (5) Class 1 milk as determined by Federal Milk 7    Marketing Orders.8        (6) Alcoholic beverages.9        (7) Medical foods as defined in 21 CFR 101.9(j)(8), 10    only if exempted by the Department by rule.11        (8) Infant formula as defined in 21 CFR 107, only if 12    exempted by the Department by rule. 13    Section 4. Rules. 14    (a) As used in this Act:15        (1) "Restricted school foods" means a food or beverage 16    product that is not listed in subsection (b) of Section 3, 17    that contains one or more of the substances specified in 18    paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 3, and that is 19    restricted from service or sale in schools, as defined by 20    the rules adopted by the Department consistent with this 21    Section.22        (2) "Ultraprocessed food of concern" or "UPF of 23    concern" means a food or food product that is an 24    ultraprocessed food, as defined in Section 3, that is of 25    concern, as determined by rules adopted by the Department   HB5507- 7 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    consistent with this Section.2    (b)(1) On or before June 1, 2028, the Department shall 3adopt rules to define ultraprocessed foods of concern and 4restricted school foods that consider all of the following 5factors:6        (A) Whether the substance or group of substances are 7    banned or restricted in other State, federal, or 8    international jurisdictions due to concerns about adverse 9    health consequences.10        (B) Whether the products include or require a warning 11    label in other State, federal, or international 12    jurisdictions due to concerns about adverse health 13    consequences.14        (C) Whether, based on reputable peer-reviewed 15    scientific evidence, a substance or group of substances 16    are linked to health harms or adverse health consequences, 17    including, but not limited to, any of the following:18            (i) cancer;19            (ii) cardiovascular disease;20            (iii) metabolic disease;21            (iv) developmental or behavioral issues;22            (v) reproductive harm;23            (vi) obesity; 24            (vii) type 2 diabetes; and25            (viii) other health harms associated with UPF 26        consumption.  HB5507- 8 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1        (D) Whether, based on reputable peer-reviewed 2    scientific evidence, a substance or group of substances 3    may be hyperpalatable, or may contribute to food 4    addiction.5        (E) Whether the food has been modified to be high in 6    saturated fat, added sugar, or salt.7        (F) Whether the food meets the requirements of the 8    United States Food and Drug Administration's final rule 9    issued on December 27, 2024, titled "Food Labeling: 10    Nutrient Content Claims; Definition of Term 'Healthy'" 11    that defines nutrient contents that are deemed to be a 12    part of a nutritious diet.13        (G) Whether the substance is a common natural 14    additive.15    (2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the Department shall be 16guided by a rigorous examination of available reputable 17peer-reviewed scientific evidence and shall consider all of 18the following:19        (A) The total number of jurisdictions where the 20    substance or product is banned, restricted, or requires a 21    warning label.22        (B) The basis for any determination by another 23    jurisdiction to ban, restrict, or require a warning label 24    for any substance or product.25        (C) The quality, caliber, and scope of any scientific 26    evidence to any above determination, including a rigorous   HB5507- 9 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    examination of whether the evidence is the product of 2    scientific research conducted according to internationally 3    recognized best practices for scientific research.4        (D) Any reputable peer-reviewed scientific evidence 5    that would call into question any determination that a 6    substance is linked to health harms or adverse health 7    consequences.8    (c)(1) The Department shall review rules and, as needed, 9update the definitions of ultraprocessed food of concern and 10restricted school foods every 5 years to accommodate any 11relevant advances in scientific knowledge, the development of 12better agricultural or manufacturing practices, or other 13changes that require revision of either or both of the 14definitions. If an update to either or both of those 15definitions would add a food product to the list of restricted 16school foods or ultraprocessed foods of concern, the 17Department shall delay the operation of the revised definition 18by 3 years to give impacted entities time to comply with the 19new definition's impact on the legal requirements of this Act.20    (2) The Department shall adopt and revise rules under this 21Section in consultation with appropriate State agencies and 22universities; school food authorities, school nutrition 23program directors, and school nutrition program managers, as 24defined in 7 CFR 210.2; after providing an opportunity for all 25interested parties to comment.26    (3) The Department may seek information from academia,   HB5507- 10 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1other states, the federal government, and other nations to 2inform implementation of this Section. 3    Section 5. Phasing out restricted school foods and 4ultraprocessed foods of concern. 5    (a) No later than July 1, 2029, a school shall begin to 6phase out restricted school foods and ultraprocessed foods of 7concern.8    (b) Beginning July 1, 2032, a vendor shall not offer 9restricted school foods or ultraprocessed foods of concern to 10a school.11    (c) The failure of a school, local educational agency, or 12vendor to comply with this Section does not create a private 13right of action. 14    Section 6. Vendors; report requirements 15    (a) On or before February 1, 2028, and on or before 16February 1 of each year thereafter through February 1, 2032, 17any vendor of food or food products to a school shall report 18the following information to the Department for each food 19product sold to a school in the past calendar year, to the 20extent it is known to the vendor:21        (1) The total quantity of that food product sold to 22    schools.23        (2) The name of the food product.24        (3) Whether the food product is an ultraprocessed   HB5507- 11 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    food.2        (4) Whether the food product is a restricted school 3    food or an ultraprocessed food of concern.4        (5) The category or categories of food to which the 5    food product belongs.6        (6) The average total calories in each food product 7    sold to schools that year.8        (7) The ingredient list of the food product.9        (8) The nutritional facts of the food product.10    (b) The requirements of subsection (a) do not apply to:11        (1) A cottage food operation as defined in Section 4 12    of the Food Handling Regulation Enforcement Act.13        (2) A home kitchen operation as defined in Section 3.6 14    of the Food Handling Regulation Enforcement Act.15        (3) A small business as defined in Section 1-75 of the 16    Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.17    (c) The failure of a vendor to comply with this Section 18does not create a private right of action.19    (d) This Section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033. 20This Section is repealed on January 1, 2034. 21    Section 7. Annual report.22    (a) On or before July 1, 2028, and on or before July 1 of 23each year thereafter through July 1, 2032, the Department, in 24consultation with the State Board of Education and using 25information reported under Section 6, shall submit to the   HB5507- 12 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1General Assembly a written report containing all of the 2following information:3        (1) A summary and analysis of information reported 4    under Section 5 for the prior year.5        (2) A summary and analysis of the progress of the 6    restricted school foods and ultraprocessed foods of 7    concern phaseout required by this Act.8        (3) Estimates of the amount of foods that are not 9    ultraprocessed food items and are sold or served to pupils 10    on campus during the school day in elementary or secondary 11    schools.12        (4) Estimates of the portion of the average elementary 13    or secondary school food intake, in calories, that is 14    composed of ultraprocessed foods.15        (5) A strategy for reducing the consumption of 16    ultraprocessed foods, restricted school foods, and 17    ultraprocessed foods of concern in schools.18        (6) Analysis of the feasibility of reducing the sale 19    or service of ultraprocessed foods, restricted school 20    foods, and ultraprocessed foods of concern in schools.21        (7) Any actions the Department or the State Board of 22    Education plans to take regarding restricted school foods 23    and ultraprocessed foods of concern.24        (8) Recommendations for State and local legislative 25    actions that could reduce the consumption of restricted 26    school foods and ultraprocessed foods of concern in   HB5507- 13 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    schools.2    (b) The Department shall annually submit the report 3prepared under subsection (a) to the Governor.4    (c) The Department shall make the report prepared under 5subsection (a) publicly available on its internet website.6    (d) This Section shall become inoperative on August 1, 72033. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2034. 8    Section 8. More stringent restrictions permitted. This Act 9does not prohibit a public entity from voluntarily enacting 10more stringent restrictions on ultraprocessed foods, 11restricted school foods, or ultraprocessed foods of concern. 12    Section 9. Compliance training and technical assistance 13    (a) For purposes of this Act, the Department shall consult 14with the State Board of Education regarding compliance 15training and technical assistance for school food service and 16procurement staff.17    (b) The Department shall establish a structure to deliver 18training and technical assistance to local educational 19agencies.20    (c) The Department may contract with providers with 21expertise in nutrition, school-community collaboration of 22service delivery and financing, and coordination and 23integration of support services to deliver training and 24technical assistance to implement this Act.  HB5507- 14 -LRB104 17456 BDA 30882 b1    (d) The topics for training shall be identified by the 2Department through a periodic survey of local educational 3agencies. The curriculum for the training provided under this 4Section may be developed in consultation with representatives 5from associations, consumer associations, and others, as 6deemed appropriate by the Department.